Hawaii statutes.
[§429-4] Real and personal property;
nonprofit association as legatee, devisee, or beneficiary. (a) A
nonprofit association shall be a legal entity separate from its members for the
purposes of acquiring, holding, encumbering, and transferring real and personal
property.

(b) A nonprofit association in its name may
acquire, hold, encumber, or transfer an estate or interest in real or personal
property.

(c) A nonprofit association may be a
beneficiary of a trust or contract, a legatee, or a devisee. [L 1999, c 161, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next